District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2701

License required.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1887, 24 Stat. 427, ch. 272, § 1
Mar. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 1284, ch. 545
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1238, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-2401.
1973 Ed., § 2-1501.
D.C. Law 12-261, Title I, § 1238 provided: “Sec. 1238. An Act to regulate steam-engineering in the District of Columbia, approved February 28, 1887 (24 Stat. 427; D.C. Code § 2-2401 et seq. § 3-2701 et seq., 2001 Ed. ), is repealed and authority thereunder transferred to the Board of Industrial Trades established by D.C. Code § 47-2853.6 [§ 47-2853.06, 2001 Ed.].”